Connecticut, session 2026, HB05361.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 8-2g of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (b) Upon the adoption of any regulation under subsection (a) of this
5 section, the zoning commission or municipal agency exercising the
6 powers of a zoning commission shall notify the legislative body of the
7 municipality of such adoption and request that the municipality
8 establish or designate an agency to implement a program designed to
9 establish income criteria in accordance with said subsection (a) and
10 oversee the sale or rental of any units of affordable housing constructed
11 pursuant to said subsection (a) to persons and families satisfying such
12 income criteria. Any municipality may, by ordinance, establish or
13 designate a municipal agency to implement such program. If the
14 legislative body does not enact such ordinance [within] not later than
15 one hundred twenty days [following] after the date of such request, the
sHB5361 / File No. 165 1

sHB5361 File No. 165
16 zoning commission or municipal agency exercising the powers of a
17 zoning commission may notify the housing authority of the
18 municipality or, in any municipality which has not by resolution
19 authorized its housing authority to transact business in accordance with
20 the provisions of section 8-40, the municipal agency with responsibility
21 for housing matters that it has adopted such regulation. Upon receiving
22 such notice, the housing authority or municipal agency with
23 responsibility for housing matters shall implement such program. Any
24 such program shall provide for a method of selecting persons satisfying
25 such income criteria to purchase or rent such units of affordable housing
26 from among a pool of applicants which method shall not discriminate
27 on the basis of age, gender, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry,
28 marital status, intellectual disability, physical disability, including, but
29 not limited to, blindness or deafness, place of residency, number of
30 children or veterans' status.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-2g(b)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5361 / File No. 165 2

sHB5361 File No. 165
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes technical changes which do not result in a fiscal impact
to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5361 / File No. 165 3

sHB5361 File No. 165
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5361
AN ACT REVISING A PROVISION CONCERNING HOUSING.